District of Columbia statutes.
38-2601.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Child with a disability” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 602(3) of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved April 13, 1970, (84 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1401(3)).

(1A)

“CTE grant program” is the supplemental career and technical education grant program established by § 38-2611 that provides grants to DCPS and public charter schools to support and enhance their career and technical education programs.

(1B)

“DCPS” means the District of Columbia Public Schools established by § 38-171.

(1C)

“Districtwide assessments” has the same meaning as provided in § 38-1800.02(13).

(2)

“Field test” means a test used during the test-development process to assess the quality and appropriateness of test items, administration procedures, scoring, and reporting.

(2A)

“Formula” shall have the meaning as provided in § 38-2901(8).

(2B)

“Fund” means the CTE Grant Program Fund established by § 38-2612.

(2C)

“IDEA “ means the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved April 13, 1970 (84 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq. ), and its implementing regulations.

(2D)

Individualized education program” or “IEP” means a written plan that specifies the special education programs and services to be provided to meet the unique educational needs of a child with a disability, as required under section 614(d) ofIDEA (20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)).

(3)

“Local education agency” or “LEA” means an educational institution at the local level that exists primarily to operate a publicly funded school or schools in the District of Columbia, including the District of Columbia Public Schools and a District of Columbia public charter school.

(4)

“OSSE” means the Office of the State Superintendent of Education established by § 38-2601.

(5)

“Practice test” means any test or other evaluation that has as its primary purpose the simulation of a Districtwide assessment or other test or evaluation as administered by an LEA rather than for assessing student proficiency levels or informing instruction and remediation needs.

(6)

“State Superintendent” means the head of OSSE appointed by the Mayor pursuant to § 38-2601.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 2b
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-84, § 102(b), 61 DCR 178
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-87, § 2(a), 61 DCR 309
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-195, § 102(a), 61 DCR 12419

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-84 added this section.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-87 redesignated (1) as (1B); and added (1), (1A), (2A) and (2B).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-195 redesignated (1) through (1B) as (1A) through (1C); added (1); and added (2C) and (2D).